Colorado, session 2026A, SB191.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-6-211 as
follows:
25.5-6-211. Gifts, grants, and donations for enhanced
reimbursement model for nursing facilities.
(1) IF THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR RECEIVES GIFTS, GRANTS, AND
DONATIONS FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING SUPPORT FOR THE
DEVELOPMENT AND FUNDING OF AN ENHANCED REIMBURSEMENT MODEL FOR
NURSING FACILITIES THAT SERVE RESIDENTS WITH BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

NEEDS, THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL USE THE GIFTS, GRANTS, AND
DONATIONS FOR THAT PURPOSE.
(2) UPON REQUEST OF THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE, THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL REPORT TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE ON
THE USE OF ANY GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS RECEIVED PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION.
(3) ANY GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS RECEIVED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION DO NOT COMMIT THE STATE TO AN
EXPENDITURE OF GENERAL FUND MONEY. THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL
NOT REDUCE AN APPROPRIATION MADE TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT FOR THE
SAME PURPOSE BECAUSE OF GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS RECEIVED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-191

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-191